District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-308.04

Authority to debar or suspend.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 804, 32 DCR 7396
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-258, § 2(c), 38 DCR 974
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(x), 44 DCR 1423
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 3, 45 DCR 745
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(e), 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 57, 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 119(f), 47 DCR 520
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-327, § 2, 52 DCR 1444
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 130(e), 52 DCR 10637
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 119(b), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 105, 178, 56 DCR 1117
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-62, § 2, 56 DCR 6599
Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 3, 57 DCR 1485
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1188.4.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of the Procurement Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-17, September 12, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5459)
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Debarment Procedures Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-71, February 6, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 2038).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Debarment Procedures Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-246, March 17, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4122).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(e) of the Procurement Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-62, April 15, 1997, 44 DCR 2413).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(e) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-133, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4832).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-374, April 24, 1998, 45 DCR 4338).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Debarment Procedures Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-153, September 30, 2003, 50 DCR 8730).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Debarment Procedures Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-349, February 6, 2004, 51 DCR 1840).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Debarment Procedures Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-550, October 27, 2004, 51 DCR 10345).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Debarment Procedures Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-4, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 2679).